Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2905
Powers.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act, a limited cooperative association has the power to do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities, including the power to sue, be sued, and defend in its own name and to maintain an action against a member for harm caused to the limited cooperative association by a violation of the articles of organization or bylaws of the limited cooperative association or violation of a duty to the limited cooperative association.

(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, a limited cooperative association shall not issue bonds, debentures, or other evidence of indebtedness to a member unless, prior to issuance, the association provides the member with a written disclosure statement that includes a conspicuous notice that the money is not insured or guaranteed by an agency or instrumentality of the United States Government and that the investment may lose value.

(b) A limited cooperative association need not provide the written disclosure statement described in subdivision (a) of this subsection to any member that is described in subdivision (8) of section 8-1111.

(c) Any extension of credit by a limited cooperative association to a member in connection with the sale of the association's goods or services shall not:

(i) Exceed nine months from the date of such sale; or

(ii) Be secured by real property, except that an extension of credit in default at the end of the original term may be extended or renewed for successive periods not exceeding nine months in length and may be secured by real property at the end of the original term or any extension or renewal thereof.

(d) No new money may be advanced by an association in connection with the extension or renewal of an extension of credit granted under subdivision (2)(c) of this section.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 5.